OLD_apertium-yua.twol
Alphabet

m n b p t k %' z c h s x j h w l y r

a e i o u 
á é í ó ú 

%{V%}:a %{V%}:i %{V%}:o %{V%}:u %{V%}:e
%{o%}:0 %{o%}:o 
%{e%}:0 %{e%}:o 

%>:0 

;

Sets 

Vow = a e i o u á é í ó ú ; 

Cns = m n b p t k %' z c h s x j h w l y r ;

Rules

"Alternation in plural pronouns"
Vx:0 <=> Vow %>: _ ;  
                    _ o b %>: [ a | o | e ] ;
        where Vx in ( %{o%} %{e%} )  ; 

!@ p e k > {o}:0 o b > a

!@ p e k >:0 {o}:o o b
!@ n a >:0 {o}:0 o b

!  25.  -Vl: Adjectives can be formed from nouns by tacking a vowel which agrees with last vowel in the noun onto the noun and ending the word with -l ( (noun)-Vl ). Examples:

"Alternation in adjectivisal suffix (a)"
%{V%}:Vx <=> :Vx Cns+ %>: _ ; 
       where Vx in ( a e i o u )  ;


!@ c a a n >:0 {V}:a l
!@ p e t >:0 {V}:e l
